Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.08.310

Liability for unlawful distributions.

(1) A director who votes for or assents to a distribution made in violation of RCW 23B.06.400 or the articles of incorporation is personally liable to the corporation for the amount of the distribution that exceeds the amount that could have been distributed without violating RCW 23B.06.400 or the articles of incorporation if it is established that the director did not perform the director's duties in compliance with RCW 23B.08.300. In any proceeding commenced under this section, a director has all of the defenses ordinarily available to a director.

(2) A director held liable under subsection (1) of this section for an unlawful distribution is entitled to contribution:

(a) From every other director who could be held liable under subsection (1) of this section for the unlawful distribution; and

(b) From each shareholder for the amount the shareholder accepted knowing the distribution was made in violation of RCW 23B.06.400 or the articles of incorporation.

(3) A shareholder who accepts a distribution made in violation of RCW 23B.06.400 or the articles of incorporation is personally liable to the corporation for the amount of any distribution received by the shareholder to the extent it exceeds the amount that could have been distributed to the shareholder without violating RCW 23B.06.400 or the articles of incorporation, if it is established that the shareholder accepted the distribution knowing that it was made in violation of RCW 23B.06.400 or the articles of incorporation.

(4) A shareholder held liable under subsection (3) of this section for an unlawful distribution is entitled to contribution from every other shareholder who could be held liable under subsection (3) of this section for the unlawful distribution.

(5) A proceeding under this section is barred unless it is commenced prior to the earlier of (a) the expiration of two years after the date on which the effect of the distribution was measured under *RCW 23B.06.400(4), or (b) the expiration of the survival period specified in RCW 23B.14.340.

[ 2006 c 52 s 3; 1989 c 165 s 98.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 23B.06.400 was amended by 2022 c 42 s 103, changing subsection (4) to subsection (5).